Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.36.060

Promoting a suicide attempt.

(1) A person is guilty of promoting a suicide attempt when he or she knowingly causes or aids another person to attempt suicide.

(2) Promoting a suicide attempt is a class C felony.

[ 2011 c 336 s 360; 1975 1st ex.s. c 260 s 9A.36.060.]